Arkansas, session 2025, HB1699.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 26-52-444(a), concerning the definitions
used in relation to the sales tax holiday, is amended to add additional
subdivisions to read as follows:
(7)(A) "Firearm safety device" means a device to be equipped or
installed on a firearm designed to prevent unauthorized access to the firearm
or to prevent it from being operated without first deactivating the device.
(B) "Firearm safety device" does not include a firearm
sold with a firearm safety device already installed on the firearm; and
(8) "Firearm storage device" means a container or enclosure
designed for the principal purpose of safely storing a firearm and secured by
a combination lock, key lock, or lock based on biometric information which
once locked is incapable of being opened without the combination, key, or
biometric information respectively.

*JLL181*
04-02-2025 10:44:01 JLL181

As Engrossed: H4/2/25 HB1699
SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 26-52-444(b), concerning the items subject
to the sales tax holiday, is amended to add additional subdivisions to read
as follows:
(7) Firearm safety device; and
(8) Firearm storage device.

SECTION 3. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the sales tax holiday occurs
the first weekend of August each year; that the Department of Finance and
Administration must provide sellers at least sixty-days' notice of any
changes to the sales tax holiday, which means the department must notify
sellers by June 1, 2025, of the addition of firearm safety devices and
firearm storage devices to the sales tax holiday; and that this act is
immediately necessary because there is a mental health crisis in the state,
and this act will help prevent tragic deaths in the state by incentivizing
the purchase of firearm safety devices and firearm storage devices during the
sales tax holiday. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act
being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health,
and safety shall become effective on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.

/s/McCullough









04-02-2025 10:44:01 JLL181